Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 52 Maintenance of Order on Campus
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-52-1.
Rules and regulations — Property and highways.

The board of governors for higher education shall make rules and regulations for the control and use of all public properties and highways under its care, and for violations of those rules and regulations; penalties, not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) and costs for any one offense, shall be imposed by any district court or police court in the city or town where the violation occurs; and in general, the board may do all acts needed for the proper execution of the powers and duties granted to and imposed upon the board by the terms of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 193, § 1.

16-52-2.
Appointment of campus police.

The board of governors for higher education may appoint one or more persons who may act as police officers upon the property and highways of state colleges and universities subject to the control of the board. The campus police officers shall protect the property of each college or university, suppress nuisances and disturbances and breaches of the peace, and enforce laws and regulations for the preservation of good order. They shall have the same powers and authority as that conferred upon municipal police officers, including the power to arrest persons for violations of state criminal statutes or for violations of city or town ordinances of the city or town in which the institution is located. They shall not carry firearms unless expressly authorized by the board of governors. Additionally, any campus police officer observing the violation of any rule or regulation of the board adopted pursuant to this chapter, including but not limited to parking and traffic regulations, may issue a summons in the manner and form set forth in §

31-27-12

or §

31-41.1-1

returnable to the district court, the police court of the city or town where the violation occurs, or the traffic tribunal as provided by law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fines and penalties recovered for violation of rules and regulations made under authority of this section shall be accounted for by the appropriate authority, which shall forward all fines or penalties for nonmoving traffic violations to the general treasurer for use by the college or university on whose campus the citation or violation was issued in accordance with §

16-32-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 84, § 1.

16-52-3.
Security personnel.

All campus police at state colleges and universities and all private security personnel employed by public or private colleges and universities shall, as a condition of their employment, apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police for a nationwide criminal records check.

The nationwide criminal records check required by this section shall conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant. The results of the nationwide criminal records check required by this section shall be provided, in writing, to the applicant and, upon the request of the applicant, to any state or private college or university to which the applicant may apply for employment.

Any private or state college or university which receives the results of a nationwide criminal records check pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall maintain those records on file for so long as the applicant is employed by the college or university as a campus police officer or as a security person.

It shall be the responsibility of the bureau of criminal identification of the state police to conduct the nationwide criminal records check required by this section. The applicant for a nationwide criminal records check under this section shall pay to the state police a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) at the time of his or her application; provided that, upon his or her employment as a campus police officer or as a security person by a private or state college or university the amount shall be reimbursed to the applicant by the college or university.

This section shall not apply to any person employed by a private or public college or university as a campus police officer or a security person on July 7, 1989.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 276, § 1.